Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 8. Department for Rights of Virginians With Disabilities.

§§ 51.5-36 through 51.5-39.

Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 572, effective July 16, 2002.

Cross references.

For provisions relating to the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy, see now §

51.5-39.13

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 572, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective until the Governor, pursuant to the applicable federal statutes and regulations, completes the process for redesignation of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy.” The Governor completed the process on July 16, 2002.